Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3217
Officers; election; bond; premium.

The board shall elect the officers of the district, including a chairman, vice-chairman, secretary, and treasurer. The offices of secretary and treasurer may be held by one person, and such person need not be a member of the board. The officers and employees of the district authorized to handle funds shall furnish and maintain a corporate surety bond in an amount not less than fifty thousand dollars, nor more than the amount of all money coming into their possession or control, to be determined by the governing board. Such bond shall be in a form and with sureties approved by the board of directors, and after approval shall be filed with the Secretary of State. The premium on such bond shall be paid by the district.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 17, p. 112;

Laws 1973, LB 206, § 2.